North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-10 Mobile Home Parks, Trailer Parks, and Campgrounds

23-10-01.
Definitions.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Campground” means any parcel of land containing three or more lots intended for occupancy by recreational vehicles or tents.

“Department” means the state department of health.

“Lot” means any piece of land of required size intended for occupancy by a mobile home, recreational vehicle, or tent.

“Mobile home” means any relocatable manufactured, modular, or prefabricated structure or unit that is designed to be used as residential living quarters. The term does not include a recreational vehicle.

“Mobile home park” means any parcel of land containing three or more lots intended for occupancy by mobile homes.

“Person” means any individual, firm, trust, partnership, public or private association, corporation, or limited liability company.

An independent recreational vehicle containing toilet and lavatory facilities.

A dependent recreational vehicle, which contains either toilet or lavatory facilities or having neither facility.

“Recreational vehicle park” means a parcel or tract of land under the control of a person, organization, or government entity where three or more lots are offered for use by members of the public or an organization for rent or lease, including park-owned recreational vehicles held out for rent or lease. A recreational vehicle park is primarily designed to accommodate recreational vehicles.

“Recreational vehicle” means a vehicular-type unit primarily designed as temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, which either has its own mode of power or is mounted on or towed by another vehicle. The term includes the following:

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 175, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1001; S.L. 1963, ch. 208, § 7; 1977, ch. 223, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 202, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 23-10-01 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 202, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1103; and Section 205 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247.

Cross-References.

Word defined by statute always has same meaning, see N.D.C.C. § 1-01-09.

23-10-01.
Definitions.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Campground” means any parcel of land containing three or more lots intended for occupancy by recreational vehicles or tents.

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

“Lot” means any piece of land of required size intended for occupancy by a mobile home, recreational vehicle, or tent.

“Mobile home” means any relocatable manufactured, modular, or prefabricated structure or unit that is designed to be used as residential living quarters. The term does not include a recreational vehicle.

“Mobile home park” means any parcel of land containing three or more lots intended for occupancy by mobile homes.

“Person” means any individual, firm, trust, partnership, public or private association, corporation, or limited liability company.

An independent recreational vehicle, containing toilet and lavatory facilities.

A dependent recreational vehicle, which contains either toilet or lavatory facilities or having neither facility.

“Recreational vehicle park” means a parcel or tract of land under the control of a person, organization, or government entity where three or more lots are offered for use by members of the public or an organization for rent or lease, including park-owned recreational vehicles held out for rent or lease. A recreational vehicle park is primarily designed to accommodate recreational vehicles.

“Recreational vehicle” means a vehicular-type unit primarily designed as temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, which either has its own mode of power or is mounted on or towed by another vehicle. The term includes the following:

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 175, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1001; S.L. 1963, ch. 208, § 7; 1977, ch. 223, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 202, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 205, effective September 1, 2022.

23-10-02.
Department to make regulations — Compliance.

The department shall have general supervision over the health, safety, sanitary condition, and legal compliance as outlined in this chapter of all mobile home parks, recreational vehicle parks, and campgrounds in this state and may promulgate and enforce appropriate rules and regulations in accordance with chapter 28-32. All mobile home parks, recreational vehicle parks, and campgrounds constructed after July 1, 1977, must be constructed in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated at the time of construction. All mobile home parks, recreational vehicle parks, and campgrounds constructed before July 1, 1977, shall meet the requirements of this chapter by July 1, 1985. All mobile home parks, recreational vehicle parks, and campgrounds shall meet rules and regulations duly promulgated after construction of the park or campground within eight years after the effective date of the rule or regulation.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 299, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 23-1002; S.L. 1955, ch. 175, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 23-1002; S.L. 1977, ch. 223, § 2; 2021, ch. 202, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

23-10-02.1.
Department authorized to accept local enforcement and inspection.

The department shall accept state, federal, city, or county enforcement of local sanitation, safety, zoning, and inspection requirements in lieu of the enforcement of sanitation, safety, and inspection requirements of the department under this chapter if the department determines that the state, federal, city, or county requirements meet or exceed the requirements of this chapter and any rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter. Before accepting state, federal, city, or county enforcement of local requirements, the department shall determine that the state, federal, city, or county requirements meet or exceed the requirements of this chapter and any rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 223, § 3; 2021, ch. 202, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

23-10-03.
License required — Application.

A person may not establish, maintain, change use, mix use, or enlarge a mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground in this state without first obtaining a license from the department.

The application for the license must be made in writing to the department and must state the location and type of the mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground, the proposed water supply, the proposed method of sewerage and garbage disposal, and such other information as may be required by the department. Application forms must be prepared by the department and distributed upon request.

The department may not issue a license under this section if the proposed mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground would prevent, interfere, or restrict proposed private development that is actively being pursued.

The department shall waive the license fee for any mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground owned by the state, a municipality, or a nonprofit organization. The department shall waive all or a portion of the license fee for any mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground that is subject to local sanitation, safety, and inspection requirements accepted by the department under section 23-10-02.1. A prorated annual license fee may be charged for new mobile home parks, recreational vehicle parks, and campgrounds. The health council may adopt rules establishing the amount and the procedures for the collection of annual license fees. The fees must be based on the cost of reviewing construction plans, conducting routine and complaint inspections, reinspection, and necessary enforcement action. License fees collected pursuant to this section must be deposited in the department’s operating fund in the state treasury and any expenditure from the fund is subject to appropriation by the legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 299, §§ 2, 3; R.C. 1943, § 23-1003; S.L. 1955, ch. 175, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 23-1003; S.L. 1977, ch. 223, § 4; 2005, ch. 32, § 18; 2021, ch. 202, § 4, effective July 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Landlord’s fraud, deceptive trade practices, and the like, in connection with mobile home owner’s lease or rental of landsite, 39 A.L.R.4th 859.

23-10-04.
Inspection.

The department shall inspect the premises as soon as practical after receiving an application for a mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground license. If the department is satisfied from the application and inspection that the mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground will not be a source of danger to the health and safety of the occupants or the general public, the department shall notify the applicant of approval of the application and of the amount of the license fee. The department must have access to and may inspect mobile home parks, recreational vehicle parks, and campgrounds at reasonable times. The department may inspect each mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, and campground in response to a complaint, violation of state law, or on a routine schedule determined by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 299, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 23-1004; S.L. 1955, ch. 175, § 4; 1957 Supp., § 23-1004; S.L. 1977, ch. 223, § 5; 1995, ch. 253, § 5; 2021, ch. 202, § 5, effective July 1, 2021.

23-10-05.
License fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 32, § 19.

23-10-06.
License issuance — Fee.

An applicant seeking licensure shall apply to the department on forms prescribed by the department. The applicant shall enclose with the application an application fee as determined by rule. The department shall issue a license to an applicant who meets all of the requirements of this chapter and any rules adopted by the health council.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 299, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 23-1006; S.L. 1955, ch. 175, § 6; 1957 Supp., § 23-1006; S.L. 1977, ch. 223, § 7; 1997, ch. 230, § 2; 2021, ch. 202, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

23-10-06.1.
License renewal.

A license issued under this chapter expires on December thirty-first of each year.

A license may be renewed by December thirty-first by submitting a renewal application, a renewal fee established rule, provided the licensee is in compliance with this chapter and any rules established by the health council.

If the renewal application and renewal fee are not received by December thirty-first, the license expires and the licensee may not operate.

Within sixty days after December thirty-first, an expired license may be renewed by submitting the renewal application, renewal fee, and a late fee. The late fee is equal to fifty percent of the license fee.

If the renewal application, renewal fee, and late fee are not received within sixty days after December thirty-first, the department may not renew the license, and the applicant shall apply and meet the requirements for licensure to be granted a license.

The department may extend the renewal deadline for applications providing proof of hardship rendering the applicant unable to meet the deadline.

The department may not renew a license if the mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground is not actively conducting business at the site, and the applicant shall apply and meet the requirements for licensure to be granted a license.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 202, § 7, effective July 1, 2021.

23-10-06.2.
License transferability.

The department shall transfer a license without charge if the proposed new owner applies in writing for a transfer of the license and certifies that the mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground will be operated in accordance with this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 202, § 8, effective July 1, 2021.

23-10-07.
Sanitation and safety.

Every mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, and campground must be operated with strict regard for the health, safety, and comfort of its occupants. The following sanitary and safety regulations must be followed:

Location: Every mobile home park must be established and maintained upon dry, well-drained ground. Any natural sinkholes or collection or pool of water must be artificially drained and filled. Recreational vehicle park and campground lots must be established and maintained upon dry, well-drained spaces.

Drinking water supply: An adequate supply of potable and safe drinking water must be provided. The operator of a mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground shall supply drinking water at the mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground which is obtained from an approved source that is a public water system or a nonpublic water system that is constructed, maintained, and operated according to law.

Towels: The placing of roller cloth towels for public use in any washroom or place within a mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground is prohibited. Individual cloth towels, cloth towels provided in mechanical dispensers, individual paper towels, or roller paper towels must be placed for use.

Toilets: Modern sanitary flush toilets must be provided where a sewer connection is available. If a sewer connection is not available, sanitary flyproof privies must be maintained. All toilets and privies must be kept in a clean, sanitary condition. Separate toilets and privies must be provided for each sex. No privy or cesspool may be located less than one hundred feet [30.48 meters] from any well, kitchen, or sleeping quarters.

Garbage: All garbage and refuse must be stored in durable, cleanable, insect- and rodent-resistant containers, and the contents removed and disposed of at a frequency that will minimize the development of objectionable odors and other conditions that attract or harbor insects and rodents. All buildings within the mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground must be screened against flies and kept in a clean and sanitary condition.

Plumbing installations: All plumbing installations in a mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground must be made in accordance with the state plumbing code and state laws.

Electrical installations: All electrical installations in a mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground must be made in accordance with the state electrical code.

Streets and roadways: Each mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, and campground must have roadways or streets wide enough to facilitate the movement of traffic within the park or campground.

Lighting: Each mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, and campground must have adequate lighting as set forth in rule.

Fire protection: Each mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, and campground must have adequate fire protection in accordance with the state fire code.

Playgrounds: Each mobile home park containing twenty-five or more lots shall provide playground space equivalent to one lot for every twenty-five lots in the park.

Multiple-story parks: A multiple-story mobile home park or trailer park may not be constructed in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 175, § 7; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1007; S.L. 1977, ch. 223, § 8; 2021, ch. 202, § 9, effective July 1, 2021.

23-10-07.1.
Service fees.

Service fees that reasonably reflect the cost of the service provided in a mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground may be charged. Fees may not be charged unless a service is actually provided.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 223, § 9; 2021, ch. 202, § 10, effective July 1, 2021.

23-10-08.
Sickness in motor or trailer courts — Penalty for failure to report. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

23-10-09.
Occupancy record.

The owner or manager of a mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground shall maintain a current record of the names of the occupants of the park or campground.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 175, § 9; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 23-1009; S.L. 1963, ch. 208, § 9; 1977, ch. 223, § 10; 2021, ch. 202, § 11, effective July 1, 2021.

23-10-10.
Posting rules and regulations.

The owner or manager of a licensed mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground conspicuously shall post or distribute a digital or hard copy of the relevant rules and regulations to each tenant in the park. Material required to be distributed or posted under this section must be provided by the department free of charge.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 299, § 12; R.C. 1943, § 23-1010; S.L. 1955, ch. 175, § 10; 1957 Supp., § 23-1010; S.L. 1977, ch. 223, § 11; 2021, ch. 202, § 12, effective July 1, 2021.

23-10-10.1.
Requirement of emergency response procedures.

The owner of a mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground shall establish a procedure for responding to emergencies and complaints. The procedure must include the ability to reach a person who has the authority to perform, or direct the performance of, duties imposed on the owner under this chapter. The procedure must be posted conspicuously in the mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, and campground or a copy must be provided to the tenants in writing.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 300, § 1; 2021, ch. 202, § 13, effective July 1, 2021.

23-10-11.
Ejection from premises.

The owner or manager of a mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground may eject any person from the premises for nonpayment of charges or fees for accommodations, for a violation of law, for disorderly conduct, for a violation of any regulation of the department, or for a violation of any reasonable rule of the mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground which is publicly posted within the park or campground.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 299, § 10; R.C. 1943, § 23-1011; S.L. 1955, ch. 175, § 11; 1957 Supp., § 23-1011; S.L. 1977, ch. 223, § 12; 2021, ch. 202, § 14, effective July 1, 2021.

23-10-12.
Revocation of license — Penalty for operating without license.

The department may deny an application or take disciplinary action, up to and including revocation, against any applicant or licensee upon the failure of the applicant or licensee to comply with this chapter or with any of the rules adopted by the health council and regulations promulgated by the department. Before the department takes disciplinary action against a license, the department shall notify the licensee in writing of the reason disciplinary action is being considered and shall provide a reasonable amount of time for correction to be made. Action taken under the authority granted in this section must comply with chapter 28-32. Any person who maintains or operates a mobile home park, recreational vehicle park, or campground without first obtaining a license, or who operates the same after revocation of the license, is guilty of an infraction.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 299, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 23-1012; S.L. 1955, ch. 175, § 12; 1957 Supp., § 23-1012; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 243; 1977, ch. 223, § 13; 2021, ch. 202, § 15, effective July 1, 2021.

23-10-13.
Change in use or closure of mobile home park.

If the owner of a mobile home park applies for the rezoning of a park, the owner shall post a notice of the proposed rezoning in the park at least five days before the public hearing on the rezoning. In addition, the owner of a mobile home park shall notify all tenants in that park in writing of a change in use at least one hundred eighty days before the change in use. A change in use is a change in the park that would alter any portion of the park which is used to lease to mobile home owners so that the portion will no longer be leased to mobile home owners. The owner or manager may not increase rent within ninety days before giving notice of a change in use for the portion of the park to which the change will apply.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 238, § 1.

23-10-14.
Mobile home security deposit.

The amount of a security deposit may not be modified after the initial lease agreement between a mobile home park owner and a tenant has been executed by both parties.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 239, § 1.